District of Columbia statutes.
22-3901

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Convicted” means having received a verdict, or a finding, of guilt in a criminal proceeding, adjudicated as being delinquent in a juvenile proceeding, or having entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere.

(2)

“HIV test” means blood testing for the human immunodeficiency virus (“HIV”) or any other identified causative agent of the acquired immune deficiency syndrome (“AIDS”).

(3)

“Mayor” means the Mayor of the District of Columbia, or his or her designee.

(4)

“Offense” means any prohibited activity involving a sexual act that includes contact between the penis and the vulva or the penis and the anus, however slight, or contact between the mouth and the penis, the mouth and the vulva, or the mouth and the anus.

(5)

“Victim” means a person injured by the commission of an offense, and includes the parent or legal guardian of the victim, if the victim is a minor, or the spouse, domestic partner, or child of a victim, if the victim is deceased or incapacitated.

Nov. 11, 1995, D.C. Law 11-74, § 2, 42 DCR 3624
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-306, § 222, 53 DCR 8610
This section is referenced in § 22-3902.
1981 Ed., § 24-491.
D.C. Law 16-306 rewrote par. (5), which read as follows: “(5) ‘Victim’ means a person injured by the commission of an offense, and includes the parent or legal guardian of a victim, if the victim is a minor, or the spouse or child of a victim, if the victim is deceased or incapacitated.”
For temporary addition of subchapter, see §§ 2 to 4 of the HIV Testing of Certain Criminal Offenders Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-87, July 6, 1995, 42 DCR 3617).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 222 of Omnibus Public Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-445, July 19, 2006, 53 DCR 6443).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 222 of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-490, October 18, 2006, 53 DCR 8686).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 222 of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-10, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1479).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 222 of Omnibus Public Safety Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-25, April 19, 2007, 54 DCR 4036).